Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,170
Shareholder approval of certain
dispositions.

(MBCA
12.02) (a) A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of assets, other
than a disposition described in section 21-2,169, requires approval of the
corporation's shareholders if the disposition would leave the corporation
without a significant continuing business activity. If a corporation retains
a business activity that represented at least twenty-five percent of total
assets at the end of the most recently completed fiscal year, and twenty-five
percent of either income from continuing operations before taxes or revenue
from continuing operations for that fiscal year, in each case of the corporation
and its subsidiaries on a consolidated basis, the corporation will conclusively
be deemed to have retained a significant continuing business activity.

(b) A disposition that requires
approval of the shareholders under subsection (a) of this section shall be
initiated by a resolution by the board of directors authorizing the disposition.
After adoption of such a resolution, the board of directors shall submit the
proposed disposition to the shareholders for their approval. The board of
directors shall also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the
shareholders approve the proposed disposition, unless (1) the board of directors
makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special
circumstances it should not make such a recommendation or (2) section 21-2,101
applies. If either subdivision (b)(1) or (2) of this section applies, the
board of directors shall transmit to the shareholders the basis for so proceeding.

(c) The board of directors
may condition its submission of a disposition to the shareholders under subsection
(b) of this section on any basis.

(d) If a disposition is required to be approved by
the shareholders under subsection (a) of this section and if the approval
is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each shareholder,
whether or not entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which the
disposition is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that the
purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the disposition
and shall contain a description of the disposition, including the terms and
conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by the corporation.

(e) Unless the articles of
incorporation or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection (c)
of this section requires a greater vote or a greater number of votes to be
present, the approval of a disposition by the shareholders shall require the
approval of the shareholders at a meeting at which a quorum consisting of
at least a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the disposition exists.

(f) After a disposition has
been approved by the shareholders under subsection (b) of this section and
at any time before the disposition has been consummated, it may be abandoned
by the corporation without action by the shareholders, subject to any contractual
rights of other parties to the disposition.

(g) A disposition of assets in the course of dissolution
under sections 21-2,184 to 21-2,202 is not governed by this section.

(h) The assets of a direct
or indirect consolidated subsidiary shall be deemed the assets of the parent
corporation for the purposes of this section.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 170.